Missouri, session 2026, HB2130.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 166.700, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 166.700, to read as follows:
166.700. As used in sections 166.700 to 166.720, the following terms mean:
(1) "Curriculum", a complete course of study for a particular content area or grade
level, including any supplemental materials;
(2) "District", the same meaning as used in section 160.011;
(3) "Educational assistance organization", the same meaning as used in section
135.712;
(4) "Illegal alien", any person who is not lawfully present in the United States or any
person who gained illegal entry into the United States;
(5) "Parent", the same meaning as used in section 135.712;
(6) "Private school", a school that is not a part of the public school system of the state
of Missouri and that charges tuition for the rendering of elementary or secondary educational
services;
(7) "Program", the same meaning as used in section 135.712;
(8) "Qualified school"[,]:
(a) a. An FPE school as defined in section 167.013; or
b. Any of the entities listed in paragraph (b) of this subdivision that comply with
the laws and regulations regarding the following requirements:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2130 2
(i) The minimum school term under section 163.021;
(ii) Dyslexia assessment and parent notification under section 167.645;
(iii) Student participation in moderate physical activity under section 167.720;
(iv) Interscholastic youth sports brain injury prevention under section 167.765;
(v) Conducting educational programs and activities and observing Veterans Day
under section 170.049;
(vi) Providing cardiopulmonary resuscitation instruction and training in high
school under section 170.310;
(vii) Displaying the flag of the United States of America and participating in the
recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance to the flag of the United States of America under
section 171.021;
(viii) Providing access to official recruiting representatives of the military under
section 171.026;
(ix) Setting an opening school term date that is no earlier than fourteen days
prior to the first Monday in September under section 171.031; and
(x) Prevailing wage requirements for school construction projects under section
290.230; and
(b) Any of the following entities that [is] are incorporated in Missouri [and]; that
[does] do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, or national origin; and that comply
with the laws and regulations regarding the requirements listed in subparagraph b. of
paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall be deemed a qualified school:
[(a)] a. A charter school as defined in section 160.400;
[(b)] b. A private school;
[(c)] c. A public school as defined in section 160.011; or
[(d)] d. A public or private virtual school;
(9) "Qualified student", any elementary or secondary school student who is a resident
of this state, who is not an illegal alien, and who:
(a) Has an approved "individualized education [plan] program" (IEP) developed
under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. Section 1400
et seq., as amended; or
(b) Is a member of a household whose total annual income does not exceed an amount
equal to three hundred percent of the income standard used to qualify for free and reduced
price lunches, and that meets at least one of the following qualifications:
a. Attended a public school as a full-time student for at least one semester during the
previous twelve months;
b. Is a child who is eligible to begin kindergarten or first grade under sections 160.051
to 160.055; or

HB 2130 3
c. Is a sibling of a qualified student who received a scholarship grant in the previous
school year and will receive a scholarship grant in the current school year.
✔